District of Columbia statutes.
50-2303.08

Electronic notice.

The Department of Motor Vehicles may offer customers the option of receiving some or all notices required under this or any other law by email or similar electronic transmission instead of regular mail; provided, that the email address, provided by the customer, shall be considered an address in the Department of Motor Vehicle’s records for the purpose of sending any notices required under this or any other law or regulation.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 308
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 301(i), 54 DCR 903
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-127: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.